Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
TEACHING FELLOWSHIP PROGRAMS

23-78-301. Short title.

The short title of this part 3 is the "Rural Colorado Grow Your Own Educator Act".

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1813, § 1, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-3.9-201 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-78-302. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

A shortage in the availability of teachers to fill teaching positions in rural local education providers is causing a significant hardship for rural local education providers;

The shortage is due, in part, to the high rate of turnover of teachers entering and leaving the profession. Following graduation and initial employment, a high percentage of teachers leave the profession within five years.

The shortage in some rural local education providers also arises because teachers, after teaching in the rural local education provider for a few years, choose to relocate to a more urban area or to an area with a lower cost of living;

A program through which a rural local education provider and an institution of higher education enter into an agreement to provide a teaching fellowship in the rural local education provider for selected teacher candidates in their final year of an approved educator preparation program, which leads to employment by the rural local education provider upon graduation, will help to ensure that teachers are well prepared to meet the rural local education provider's needs and expectations, have met specific competencies the rural local education provider identified as being necessary, and are acclimated into the rural local education provider upon hiring. A teacher who receives this level of specific preparation for employment with a specific employer is more likely to remain in the profession and thereby help to reduce the teacher shortage.

In selecting teacher candidates to participate in a teaching fellowship program, a rural local education provider and an institution of higher education should give preference to applicants who resided within the area surrounding the rural local education provider before attending a higher education institution and are seeking the opportunity to return to the local education provider as a teacher.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1813, § 1, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-3.9-202 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-78-303. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agreement" means a teaching fellowship program agreement as described in section 23-78-305.

"Approved educator preparation program" has the same meaning as provided in section 23-1-121.

"Eligible student" means an in-state student, as defined in section 23-7-102, who is enrolled in the final year of an approved educator preparation program at an institution of higher education.

"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means:

A state institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-18-102;

A local district college that offers an approved educator preparation program; or

A private college or university, as defined in section 23-2-102, that is authorized pursuant to article 2 of this title 23 and offers an approved educator preparation program.

(4.5) "Remote school district" means a school district in Colorado, irrespective of pupil enrollment, that is more than fifty miles from the nearest large, urbanized area.

"Rural charter school" means a charter school that is authorized by a rural school district pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22 or an institute charter school that is authorized by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22 and is located within a rural school district.

"Rural local education provider" means a remote school district, a rural school district, a rural charter school, or a board of cooperative services that operates a public school that is located within a rural school district.

"Rural school district" means a school district in Colorado that the department of education determines is rural, based on the geographic size of the school district and the distance of the school district from the nearest large, urbanized area.

"Stipend" means a teaching fellowship stipend distributed to a teaching fellow as wages for employment or as state-based financial aid as provided in section 23-78-306.

"Teaching fellow" means an eligible student who participates in a teaching fellowship program.

"Teaching fellowship program" or "program" means a teaching fellowship program created by a rural local education provider and an institution of higher education pursuant to an agreement as described in section 23-78-305.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1814, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 2020:

(8) amended, (SB 20-158), ch. 198, p. 971, § 5, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(4.5) added and (6) amended, (SB 21-185), ch. 246, p. 1340, § 27, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-3.9-203 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-78-304. Department of education - eligible rural local education provider - identified.

Within thirty days after May 25, 2018, the department of education shall identify geographic areas of the state and specific subject areas and grade levels for which there are critical shortages of qualified teachers to fill elementary and secondary teaching positions in public schools. The department shall post a map showing the identified geographic areas and a list of the identified subjects on the department website. The department shall annually review the pertinent data and update the identified geographic areas and subjects as appropriate.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1815, § 1, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-3.9-204 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-78-305. Teaching fellowship program - agreements - requirements - report.

The governing board of a rural local education provider may enter into an agreement with an institution of higher education to create a teaching fellowship program if the rural local education provider:

Is located within one of the geographic areas, or is seeking to fill a teaching position in one of the subjects, identified by the department of education pursuant to section 23-78-304;

Demonstrates a serious, chronic difficulty in hiring or retaining teachers; and

Demonstrates a level of financial need that makes payment of fifty percent of a teaching fellow's stipend a hardship for the rural local education provider.

At a minimum, each agreement must describe the roles and expectations of the rural local education provider and the institution of higher education in implementing the program, including at a minimum:

The commitment of the rural local education provider and the institution of higher education to jointly design an individualized, one-year teaching fellowship for each teaching fellow who is selected, which fellowship is designed to meet the needs of both the rural local education provider and the teaching fellow. At a minimum, the design must include:

An evaluation at the beginning of the fellowship year of each applying eligible student's strengths and areas for growth and improvement, the needs of the rural local education provider, and the competencies that the applying eligible student, if selected, must master over the course of the fellowship year, which the rural local education provider and the institution of higher education use, in part, for determining whether the eligible student is well-matched with the rural local education provider;

Joint selection by the rural local education provider and the institution of higher education of each teaching fellow and any criteria, in addition to that identified in subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section, that they apply in selecting the teaching fellows. The rural local education provider and the institution may give priority to an applying eligible student who resided within the area surrounding the rural local education provider before attending the institution and seeks to return to the rural local education provider as a teacher.

Identification of the competencies that each teaching fellow is expected to master by the completion of the fellowship year, which are in addition to the teacher quality standards adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 22-2-109 and reflect the unique needs of the rural local education provider;

Explanation of how the rural local education provider and the institution of higher education will support the teaching fellow in mastering the identified competencies;

Assignment by the rural local education provider of an experienced, nonprobationary teacher who has received a highly effective rating through the rural local education provider's performance evaluation system implemented pursuant to section 22-9-106 to act as a supervising teacher for the teaching fellow; and

Inclusion of the teaching fellow in the range of activities expected of the teachers employed by the rural local education provider, including at a minimum professional development opportunities and the rural local education provider's new teacher induction program;

The commitment of the rural local education provider to extend an offer of employment to each teaching fellow who successfully completes the fellowship year, as determined by the rural local education provider based on the teaching fellow's mastery of the competencies, satisfactory completion of assigned duties, completion of graduation requirements, and attainment of an initial teacher license as provided in article 60.5 of title 22;

The commitment of the institution of higher education to:

Provide a stipend to each selected teaching fellow as provided in section 23-78-306;

Disburse the stipend using the standard methods for allocating state-based financial aid or as wages for employment, as selected by the teaching fellow pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; and

Award to the teaching fellow course credits for the fellowship and ensure the teaching fellow has the opportunity to complete during the fellowship year any other course work or other requirements to complete the approved educator preparation program in which the teaching fellow is enrolled; and

The acknowledgment of the rural local education provider and the institution of higher education that either party may cancel the agreement at any time for any reason. The agreement must specify the responsibilities of each party if either cancels the agreement, including at a minimum the responsibilities owed to a teaching fellow if the agreement is canceled during his or her fellowship year.

During the one-year teaching fellowship, each teaching fellow is expected to complete the approved educator preparation program in which he or she is enrolled and any additional requirements for completing his or her postsecondary credential. Each teaching fellow must choose whether to have a stipend awarded as state-based financial aid or as wages for employment. Each teaching fellow must commit to at least two full school years of employment by the rural local education provider following completion of the fellowship year if the teaching fellow receives an offer of employment from the rural local education provider for each of the two school years. A teaching fellow who receives offers of employment for both school years and does not complete the two full school years of employment must repay the amount received as a stipend during the fellowship year.

A rural local education provider that is located within one of the geographic areas, or that is seeking to fill a teaching position in one of the subjects, identified by the department of education pursuant to section 23-78-304, may enter into agreements with multiple institutions of higher education. A rural local education provider may enter into an agreement with an institution of higher education regardless of whether the rural local education provider is located within the institution's service area. A rural local education provider may seek assistance from the department of higher education in identifying an appropriate institution of higher education with which to enter into an agreement.

The rural local education provider and institution of higher education that enter into an agreement shall annually prepare a report concerning the implementation of the agreement. The report, at a minimum, must include:

The number of teaching fellows participating in the program and the subjects they were teaching;

Whether the teaching fellows mastered the competencies identified by the rural local education provider and the institution of higher education;

The effectiveness of the agreement and any modifications necessary to improve the quality of the teaching fellowship program;

Whether the participating rural local education provider employed the teaching fellow at the completion of the fellowship and the number of years the teaching fellow remains employed with the rural local education provider, to the extent the information is available; and

If available, data concerning the performance of teaching fellows after they are employed by the rural local education provider.

A rural local education provider and an institution of higher education that enter into an agreement shall annually decide whether to renew the agreement for the upcoming school year and may modify the agreement as appropriate.

An institution of higher education that enters into an agreement shall file the finalized agreement, notices of renewal of the agreement, any modifications to the agreement, documentation of the participating rural local education provider's chronic hiring difficulty and financial need, and copies of the annual report with the department of higher education.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1815, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 2020:

(2)(c)(II) and (3) amended, (SB 20-158), ch. 198, p. 971, § 6, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-3.9-205 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-78-306. Teaching fellowship stipends - amount - funding.

Subject to available appropriations, up to one hundred teaching fellows per year, selected as provided in subsection (2) of this section, shall receive financial assistance in the form of a stipend in the amount of ten thousand dollars disbursed during the fellowship year. As provided in section 23-78-305 (3), the teaching fellow must choose whether the stipend is awarded as state-based financial aid or as wages for employment. In either case, the stipend is awarded without regard to need and is in addition to any other financial assistance that may be available to the teaching fellow. A teaching fellow may apply the stipend to pay the costs of attendance during the year in which he or she participates in the teaching fellowship program.

The teaching fellowship stipends shall be paid fifty percent by the department of higher education from the amount appropriated for this part 3 and fifty percent by the participating institution of higher education. An institution of higher education that participates in a teaching fellowship program shall notify the department of higher education of the enrollment of each student who enters into a teaching fellowship program. Based on the level of chronic hiring difficulty and financial need demonstrated by each participating rural local education provider, the department shall annually select up to one hundred students enrolled in teaching fellowship programs to receive the stipend and shall forward to the institution fifty percent of the amount of the stipend for each selected student. The institution shall provide the remaining fifty percent of the stipend and disburse one hundred percent of each stipend to the selected teaching fellows as provided in section 23-78-305 (2)(c).

If, upon completion of a teaching fellowship program, a teaching fellow does not accept an offer of employment made by the participating rural local education provider, or does not complete two full school years of employment as required in section 23-78-305 (3), the teaching fellow must repay the amount received as a stipend during the teaching fellowship year in accordance with terms established by the participating institution of higher education, and upon receipt of repayment the institution shall refund to the department of higher education the amount of the stipend.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the department of higher education the amount required to implement the teaching fellowship programs as provided in this part 3. Any unexpended and unencumbered money from an appropriation made for the purposes of this part 3 for a state fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2020, remains available for expenditure by the department for the purposes of this part 3 and for the purposes of sections 23-76-104 and 23-76-106 in the next fiscal year without further appropriation.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1818, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-158), ch. 198, p. 971, § 7, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-3.9-206 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-78-307. Department of higher education - review of agreements - report.

The department of higher education shall review each agreement, and any modifications to the agreement, that it receives from an institution of higher education to ensure that the agreement meets the minimum requirements specified in section 23-78-305. If the department finds that an agreement does not meet the requirements, it shall return the agreement to the appropriate rural local education provider and institution of higher education for modification.

The department of higher education shall review the annual report received concerning each teaching fellowship program and submit an annual summary report to the state board of education, the Colorado commission on higher education, the joint budget committee of the general assembly, and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees. The department of higher education shall prepare and submit the summary report annually, notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), as part of the report required in section 23-1-121 (6). At a minimum, the summary report must include:

Data concerning implementation of the teaching fellowship programs across the state, including:

The participating rural local education providers and institutions of higher education;

The number of teaching fellows; and

The subjects and grade levels that the fellows are teaching; and

An evaluation of the effectiveness of the teaching fellowship programs in reducing the shortage of teachers in the state, based at least in part on the number of teaching fellows who are employed by the participating rural local education providers at the completion of the fellowship, the number who remain employed through subsequent years, and the level of performance of the persons who are employed as teachers following completion of a teaching fellowship, to the extent the data is available.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1819, § 1, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-3.9-207 as it existed prior to 2019.